Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB884.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 214 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall include alpha-gal syndrome in
its list of noncommunicable diseases that health care providers and health care
facilities are required to report to a local health department or to the Department
for Public Health in accordance with KRS 214.010.
(2) The laboratory that confirms a positive test result of alpha-gal syndrome shall
submit the confirmation to the Department for Public Health within five (5) days
using a reporting system required by the department. The laboratory shall use
diagnostic tests for alpha-gal syndrome that are recommended by the United
States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).
(3) The department shall follow up annually on reported cases of alpha-gal
syndrome using appropriate random sampling methods for confirming that
positive cases continue to meet the most current CDC surveillance case definition
of alpha-gal syndrome.
(4) The department shall submit an annual report to the CDC summarizing its
findings related to the reporting and incidence of alpha-gal syndrome.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/2/2026 11:22 AM Jacketed